Utah statutes.
53A-15-1212.5.   Time period to enroll in an online course.

(1)  To provide an LEA and online course providers with estimates of online course enrollment, a student should enroll in an online course, or declare an intention to enroll in an online course, during the high school course registration period designated by the LEA.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1) and except as provided in Subsection (3), a student may enroll in an online course at any time during a calendar year.

(3) (a)  A student may alter a course schedule by dropping a traditional classroom course and adding an online course consistent with course schedule alteration procedures adopted by the student's primary LEA of enrollment or high school.

(b)  A school district's or high school's deadline for dropping a traditional classroom course and adding an online course shall be the same deadline for dropping and adding a traditional classroom course.



Enacted by Chapter 238, 2012 General Session

